Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-612
Pupils; transportation allowance; claims; contents; limitation upon action for recovery.

All claims for transportation allowance under section 79-611 shall be filed for payment monthly. No action for recovery on any claim for transportation allowance filed with the secretary of the school board or board of education shall be brought after twelve months from the last day of any month of actual attendance for which attendance is claimed. All claims shall show the names of the students and the dates of the trips for which the allowance is claimed and shall be signed by the claimant.

Laws 1941, c. 163, § 1, p. 650;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1902;

R.S.1943, § 79-1908;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 129, p. 736;

Laws 1971, LB 215, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-491;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 373.

Filing of claim monthly is a mandatory prerequisite to recovery. George v. School Dist. No. 24 of Red Willow County, 157 Neb. 791, 61 N.W.2d 401 (1953).